Utah statutes.
58-28-603.   Medical records.

Medical records maintained by a person licensed under this chapter:

(1)  shall meet the standards and ethics of the profession;

(2)  shall be maintained in accordance with administrative rules adopted by the division in consultation with the board; and

(3)  may be maintained in electronic format.



Enacted by Chapter 109, 2006 General Session

